District of Columbia statutes.
50-1002

Annual report; rules.

(a)

By June 30th of each year, the Mayor shall submit to the Council of the District of Columbia a report that shall include, but not be limited, to the following:

(1)

The number of reports of convictions received by the District of Columbia (“District”) from other states pursuant to this chapter;

(2)

A brief description of the traffic violations upon which the convictions were based and the number of reports received for each violation;

(3)

The number of revocations and suspensions issued by the District for each violation; and

(4)

The number of reports of convictions sent to each state by the District pursuant to this chapter including a brief description of the traffic violations upon which the convictions were based and the number of reports issued for each violation.

(b)

The Mayor shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, and the rules shall at least govern what affect convictions in other states shall have in the District.

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-184, § 3, 32 DCR 850
1981 Ed., § 40-1502.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 5-184, “Driver License Compact Adoption Act of 1984.”, see Mayor’s Order 88-63, March 15, 1988.
The word “affect” in subsection (b) probably should be “effect”.